Georgia, session 2025_26, HB576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the "Fair Business Practices Act of 1975," is amended by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"10-1-393.20.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Money transmitter' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code
Section 7-1-680.
H. B. 576
- 1 -

LC 55 0531
(2) 'Peer-to-peer payment platform' means an online digital platform that allows a user
to transfer funds from his or her bank account to another person's bank account.
(b) Any money transmitter that operates a peer-to-peer payment platform shall delay the
processing of any transaction on such platform involving the transfer of funds initiated by
a user of such platform for a period of not less than 15 minutes, during which time such
user shall be able to cancel the transaction.
(c) Any money transmitter that violates this Code section shall be subject to the penalties
provided in this part."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 576
- 2 -